el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Ιατρικά είδη > Ιατρικός εκπαιδευτικός εξοπλισμός: Εκπαιδευτικά ανθρώπινα ομοιώματα ιατρικής & έκτακτης ανάγκης; Αξεσουάρ ιατρικού εκπαιδευτικού εξοπλισμού; Προσομοιωτές εκπαίδευσης διαδικασιών και εκπαιδευτές εργασιών; Κιτ προσομοιωτών και πακέτα εκπαίδευσης; Συνθετικά μοντέλα ιστών και ένθετα εκπαίδευσης
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Secteur médical > Matériel d’enseignement médical: Mannequins de formation médicale et de secourisme; Accessoires pour matériel pédagogique médical; Simulateurs de procédures et simulateurs de tâches; Kit de simulateurs et packs de formation; Modèles de tissus synthétiques et supports de formation
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 醫療業 > 醫療教育設備: 醫療和緊急情況訓練用假人; 醫療教育設備配件; 程序訓練模擬器與任務訓練機; 模擬器工具包與訓練套裝組合; 合成組織模型與訓練墊
it: Commercio e industria > Medicina > Apparecchiature formative per medici: Manichini di addestramento per rianimazione o salvataggio; Accessori per apparecchiature didattiche mediche; Simulatori di addestramento alle procedure e formatori di attività; Kit simulatore e pacchetto di formazione; Modelli di tessuti sintetici e cuscinetti di addestramento
en: Business & Industrial > Medical > Medical Teaching Equipment: Medical & Emergency Response Training Mannequins; Medical Teaching Equipment Accessories; Procedure Training Simulators & Task Trainers; Simulator Kits & Training Bundles; Synthetic Tissue Models & Training Pads
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Branża medyczna > Sprzęt do szkoleń medycznych: Manekiny do szkoleń z pierwszej pomocy; Akcesoria do medycznego sprzętu szkoleniowego; Symulatory do nauki procedur oraz trenażery umiejętności; Zestawy symulatorów i pakiety szkoleniowe; Modele tkanek syntetycznych i podkładki szkoleniowe
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Sectorul medical > Echipament medical pentru pregătire: Manechine de pregătire medicală și pentru urgențe; Accesorii pentru echipamente didactice medicale; Simulatoare de instruire procedurală și dispozitive pentru exersarea procedurilor; Kituri de simulare și pachete de instruire; Modele de țesut sintetic și suporturi pentru instruire
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Orvosi > Orvosi oktatási berendezések: Orvosi és sürgősségi reagálási tréningpróbababák; Orvosi oktatóeszközök tartozékai; Eljárástréning-szimulátorok és feladattréner; Szimulátorkészlet és tréningcsomag; Szintetikus szövetmodellek és edzőpárnák
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Lääketiede > Lääketieteelliset opetusvälineet: Elvytysnuket; Lääketieteellisten opetusvälineiden lisävarusteet; Toimenpidekoulutussimulaattorit ja toimenpidemallit; Simulaattorisarjat ja koulutuspaketit; Synteettiset kudosmallit ja harjoitustyynyt
nb: Forretninger og industri > Medisinsk > Medisinsk opplæringsutstyr: Dukker for medisinsk og nødopplæring; Tilbehør til medisinsk undervisningsutstyr; Opplæringssimulatorer for prosedyrer og øvelse til oppgaver; Simulatorsett og øvingspakker; Syntetiske vevsmodeller og øvingssputer
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Zdravstvo > Medicinska učna oprema: Lutke za usposabljanje na področju zdravstva in reševanja; Dodatki za opremo za medicinsko poučevanje; Simulatorji za usposabljanje za postopke in pripomočki za učenje o postopku; Kompleti simulatorjev in paketi za usposabljanje; Modeli sintetičnih tkiv in vadbene blazinice
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 医療 > 医療教育用品: CPRマネキン; 医療教育機器アクセサリー; 手技訓練用シミュレータとタスクトレーナー; シミュレータキットとトレーニング教材セット; 合成組織モデルとトレーニングパッド
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Medicina > Medicinos mokymo įranga: Medicinos ir skubios pagalbos mokymo manekenai; Medicinos mokymo įrangos priedai; Procedūrų mokymo simuliatoriai ir užduočių treniruokliai; Simuliatorių rinkiniai ir mokymo paketai; Sintetinių audinių modeliai ir treniruočių kilimėliai
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > การแพทย์ > อุปกรณ์ช่วยสอนทางการแพทย์: หุ่นฝึกอบรมการตอบสนองทางการแพทย์และในกรณีฉุกเฉิน; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับอุปกรณ์การสอนทางการแพทย์; เครื่องจำลองการฝึกซ้อมหัตถการและอุปกรณ์ฝึกทักษะ; ชุดเครื่องมือสำหรับเครื่องจำลองและชุดการฝึกอบรม; แบบจำลองเนื้อเยื่อสังเคราะห์และแผ่นฝึกหัด
es: Economía e industria > Productos médicos > Equipos para la docencia médica: Maniquís para formación ante situaciones médicas y de emergencia; Accesorios de equipos para la docencia médica; Simuladores de entrenamiento de procedimientos y capacitadores de tareas; Kits simuladores y paquetes de capacitación; Modelos de tejido sintético y almohadillas de entrenamiento
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 医疗 > 医疗教学设备: 医疗/急救训练人体模型; 医疗教学设备配件; 手术操作训练模拟器与任务训练器; 模拟器套件与训练组合包; 合成组织模型与训练垫
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Y tế > Thiết bị giảng dạy y tế: Ma-nơ-canh dùng cho đào tạo y tế và các trường hợp khẩn cấp; Phụ kiện Thiết bị Giảng dạy Y khoa; Mô hình Mô phỏng Huấn luyện Thủ thuật & Mô hình Thực hành; Bộ Mô hình Mô phỏng & Gói Huấn luyện; Mô hình Mô Tổng hợp & Miếng đệm Thực hành
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Medisch > Apparatuur voor medisch onderwijs: Reanimatie- en oefenpoppen; Accessoires voor medische lesapparatuur; Proceduretrainingssimulatoren en vaardigheidstrainers; Simulatorkits en trainingbundels; Synthetisch weefselmodellen en oefenpads
da: Erhverv og industri > Medicinsk > Medicinsk undervisningsudstyr: Førstehjælpsdukker; Tilbehør til medicinsk undervisningsudstyr; Proceduretræningssimulatorer og opgavetrænere; Simulatorsæt og træningssampakker; Syntetiske vævsmodeller og træningspuder
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Медицина > Медицинское оборудование для обучения: Медицинские манекены для обучения; Аксессуары для медицинского оборудования для обучения; Симуляторы для отработки процедур и тренажеры клинических навыков; Наборы симуляторов и учебные комплекты; Модели из искусственных тканей и тренажеры-подушечки
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Медицински > Медицинско учебно оборудване: Медицински и манекени за обучение; Аксесоари за оборудване за медицинско обучение; Процедурни симулатори и тренажори; Комплекти симулатори и пакети за обучение; Синтетични модели на тъкани и тренировъчни подложки
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Zdravotníctvo > Zdravotnícke vyučovacie zariadenia: Figuríny na výcvik poskytovania prvej pomoci; Príslušenstvo pre zdravotnícke vyučovacie zariadenia; Simulátory zákrokov a trenažéry úloh; Simulačné a tréningové súpravy; Modely syntetických tkanív a tréningové podložky
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 의료 > 의료 교육 장비: 의료/응급처치교육 마네킹; 의료 교육 장비 액세서리; 시술 교육 시뮬레이터 및 태스크 트레이너; 시뮬레이터 키트 및 교육 번들; 합성 조직 모델 및 교육용 패드
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Medikal > Tıp Eğitimi Ekipmanları: Tıbbi ve Acil Müdahale Eğitim Mankenleri; Tıp Eğitim Ekipmanları Aksesuarları; Prosedür Eğitim Simülatörleri ve Görev Eğitmenleri; Simülatör kiti ve Eğitim paketi; Sentetik Doku Modelleri ve Eğitim Pedleri
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Medizinischer Bereich > Medizinische Schulungsgeräte: HLW-Puppen; Zubehör für medizinische Schulungsgeräte; Verfahrenstrainingssimulatoren & Aufgabentrainer; Simulatorkits & Trainingspakete; Synthetische Gewebemodelle & Trainingspads
sv: Företag och industri > Sjukvård > Medicinsk utbildningsutrustning: HLR-dockor; Tillbehör för medicinsk undervisningsutrustning; Procedurträningssimulatorer och uppgiftstränare; Simulatorkit och träningspaket; Syntetiska vävnadsmodeller och träningsdynor
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Zdravotnictví > Výukové pomůcky pro zdravotnické a lékařské obory: Zdravotnické a resuscitační figuríny; Příslušenství k výukovému lékařskému vybavení; Simulátory pro výuku procedur a trenažéry úkolů; Sady simulátorů a výukové balíčky; Modely syntetické tkáně a výukové podložky
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Medicina > Equipamento de ensino médico: Manequins para prática de ressuscitação cardiopulmonar; Acessórios para equipamentos de ensino médico; Simuladores de treinamento de procedimentos e treinadores de tarefas; Kits de simuladores e pacotes de treinamento; Modelos de tecido sintético e almofadas de treinamento
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Médico > Equipamento de ensino médico: Manequins de formação de resposta de emergência e médicos; Acessórios para equipamentos de ensino médico; Simuladores de treino de procedimentos e treinador de tarefas; Kit simulador e pacotes de treino; Modelos de tecido sintético e almofadas de treino
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Medicina > Medicinska oprema za učenje: Lutke za obuku za medicinu i prvu pomoć; Pribor za medicinsku opremu za učenje; Simulatori za obuku o zahvatu i trenažeri za zadatke; Kompleti simulatora i paketi za obuku; Modeli od sintetičkog tkiva i jastučići za vježbanje